basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX A1   t           š          [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          í          [^čř]ít
SFX A1   t           me         [^čř]ít
SFX A1   t           te         [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          i          [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          ěme        [bdfmnptvw]ít
SFX A1   ít          ěte        [bdfmnptvw]ít
SFX A1   ít          eme        [^bdfmnptvwč]ít
SFX A1   ít          ete        [^bdfmnptvwč]ít
SFX A1   ít          ě          [bdfmnptvw]ít
SFX A1   ít          e          [^bdfmnptvwč]ít
SFX A1   t           c          [^čř]ít
SFX A1   t           ce         [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          il         [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          ila        [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          ilo        [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          ili        [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          ily        [^čř]ít
SFX A1   ít          eme        žít
SFX A1   ít          ete        žít
SFX A1   ít          u          řít
SFX A1   ít          eš         řít
SFX A1   ít          e          řít
SFX A1   ít          eme        řít
SFX A1   ít          ete        řít
SFX A1   ít          ou         řít
SFX A1   ít          i          řít
SFX A1   ít          el         řít
SFX A1   ít          ela        řít
SFX A1   ít          elo        řít
SFX A1   ít          eli        řít
SFX A1   ít          ely        řít
SFX A1   ít          nu         čít
SFX A1   ít          neš        čít
SFX A1   ít          ne         čít
SFX A1   ít          neme       čít
SFX A1   ít          nete       čít
SFX A1   ít          nou        čít
SFX A1   ít          ni         čít
SFX A1   ít          něme       čít
SFX A1   ít          něte       čít
SFX A1   ít          al         čít
SFX A1   ít          ala        čít
SFX A1   ít          alo        čít
SFX A1   ít          ali        čít
SFX A1   ít          aly        čít
SFX A1   ět          ím         [^d]ět
SFX A1   ět          íš         [^d]ět
SFX A1   ět          í          [^d]ět
SFX A1   ět          íme        [^d]ět
SFX A1   ět          íte        [^d]ět
SFX A1   t           j          [^dnt]ět
SFX A1   t           jme        [^dnt]ět
SFX A1   t           jte        [^dnt]ět
SFX A1   ědět        ím         ědět
SFX A1   ědět        íš         ědět
SFX A1   ědět        í          ědět
SFX A1   ědět        íme        ědět
SFX A1   ědět        íte        ědět
SFX A1   ět          í          ědět
SFX A1   dět         z          ědět
SFX A1   dět         zme        ědět
SFX A1   dět         zte        ědět
SFX A1   t           j          ádět
SFX A1   t           jme        ádět
SFX A1   t           jte        ádět
SFX A1   ět          ím         [^ě]dět
SFX A1   ět          íš         [^ě]dět
SFX A1   ět          í          [^ě]dět
SFX A1   ět          íme        [^ě]dět
SFX A1   ět          íte        [^ě]dět
SFX A1   dět         ď          [^áě]dět
SFX A1   dět         ďte        [^áě]dět
SFX A1   dět         ďme        [^áě]dět
SFX A1   tět         ť          tět
SFX A1   tět         ťme        tět
SFX A1   tět         ťte        tět
SFX A1   ět          i          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A1   ět          ěme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A1   ět          ěte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A1   nět         ň          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A1   nět         ňme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A1   nět         ňte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A1   ět          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]nět
SFX A1   ět          ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]nět
SFX A1   ět          ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]nět
SFX A1   nět         ň          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nět
SFX A1   nět         ňme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nět
SFX A1   nět         ňte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nět
SFX A1   et          ím         et
SFX A1   et          íš         et
SFX A1   et          í          et
SFX A1   et          íme        et
SFX A1   et          íte        et
SFX A1   t           0          et
SFX A1   et          íc         et
SFX A1   et          íce        et
SFX A1   et          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   t           me         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   0           e          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   t           j          [áéíóúýů][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   t           jme        [áéíóúýů][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   t           jte        [áéíóúýů][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   et          0          [aeiouyěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   et          me         [aeiouyěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   et          te         [aeiouyěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A1   t           0          ět
SFX A1   ět          íc         ět
SFX A1   ět          íce        ět
SFX A1   out         u          nout
SFX A1   out         eš         nout
SFX A1   out         e          nout
SFX A1   out         eme        nout
SFX A1   out         ete        nout
SFX A1   t           0          nout
SFX A1   out         a          nout
SFX A1   t           c          nout
SFX A1   t           ce         nout
SFX A1   nout        ň          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   nout        ňme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   nout        ňte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         i          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         ěme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         ěte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   nout        ň          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nout
SFX A1   nout        ňme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nout
SFX A1   nout        ňte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nout
SFX A1   out         i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   out         ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   out         ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   out         ul         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         ula        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         ulo        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         uli        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   out         uly        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A1   nout        l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A1   nout        la         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A1   nout        lo         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A1   nout        li         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A1   nout        ly         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A1   nout        l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůěr][^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   nout        l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůěr][^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   out         ul         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   nout        l          l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   nout        la         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   nout        lo         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   nout        li         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   nout        ly         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A1   out         ul         [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A1   out         ula        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A1   out         ulo        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A1   out         uli        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A1   out         uly        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A1   0           a          n
SFX A1   0           o          n
SFX A1   0           i          n
SFX A1   0           y          n
SFX A1   0           a          yt
SFX A1   0           o          yt
SFX A1   0           i          yt
SFX A1   0           y          yt
SFX A1   0           a          [^o]ut
SFX A1   0           o          [^o]ut
SFX A1   0           i          [^o]ut
SFX A1   0           y          [^o]ut
SFX A1   0           i          [^coy]t
SFX A1   t           i          ct
