basic-cs.dic
akcelerovat/A1T1N1
amnestovat/A1T1N1
aranžovat/A1T1N1
avizovat/A1T1N1
bičovat/A1T1N1
blížit/A1T1N1
bouchnout/A1T1N1
bruslit/A1N1
burácet/A1J1N1
cenit/A1T1N1
chlácholit/A1T1N1
chybit/A1T1N1
cpát/A1T1
debatovat/A1T1N1
delegovat/A1T1N1
destabilizovat/A1T1N1
dimenzovat/A1T1N1
distribuovat/A1T1N1
doceňovat/A1T1N1
dohonit/A1T1N1
dokreslovat/A1T1N1
doléčit/A1T1N1
dopadnout/A1N1
dopovat/A1N1
dorazit/A1C1X1N1
dosloužit/A1T1N1
dosáhnout/A1C1N1
dotáhnout/A1C1N1
dovézt/A1T1N1
drancovat/A1T1N1
drát/A1T1H1R1
dychtit/A1T1N1
důvěřovat/A1T1N1
evidovat/A1T1N1
falšovat/A1T1N1
filtrovat/A1T1N1
fouknout/A1T1N1
glosovat/A1T1N1
hanět/A1J1T1N1
hlasovat/A1T1N1
hnízdit/A1T1N1
horlit/A1N1
hovět/A1J1N1
hroutit/A1C1N1
hyzdit/A1C1T1N1
ilustrovat/A1T1N1
infikovat/A1T1N1
instruovat/A1T1N1
ironizovat/A1T1N1
jmenovat/A1T1N1
kapitulovat/A1T1N1
klenout/A1T1N1
klopit/A1T1N1
koketovat/A1T1N1
kompletovat/A1T1N1
konfiskovat/A1T1N1
kontrastovat/A1T1N1
končit/A1T1N1
kotit/A1N1
kouřit/A1T1N1
krotit/A1C1N1
krátit/A1C1N1
kvapit/A1T1N1
kázat/A1T1N1
křtít/A1T1N1
lebedit/A1N1
letět/A1T1N1
linout/A1T1N1
lomit/A1T1N1
lámat/A1T1N1
manipulovat/A1T1N1
mazlit/A1T1N1
mlátit/A1C1N1
modifikovat/A1T1N1
mračit/A1T1N1
myslet/A1N1
mýlit/A1T1N1
naběhnout/A1N1
nadhodnotit/A1C1N1
nafouknout/A1T1N1
nahromadit/A1T1N1
nakreslit/A1T1N1
nalepit/A1T1N1
namazat/A1T1N1
nanést/A1T1N1
napojovat/A1T1N1
napálit/A1T1N1
narušovat/A1T1N1
naskočit/A1N1
nastavovat/A1T1N1
nastínit/A1T1N1
natahovat/A1T1N1
natřít/A1T1N1
navrhnout/A1C1N1
navýšit/A1T1N1
načít/A1T1N1
nažhavit/A1T1N1
normalizovat/A1T1N1
následovat/A1T1N1
obdivovat/A1T1N1
objasňovat/A1T1N1
obléknout/A1T1N1
obohacovat/A1T1N1
obrátit/A1C1N1
obsáhnout/A1C1T1N1
oběsit/A1C1N1
ochlazovat/A1T1N1
ocitnout/A1N1
odběhnout/A1N1
oddlužit/A1T1N1
odepisovat/A1T1N1
odhlédnout/A1N1
odkoupit/A1T1N1
odložit/A1T1N1
odpojit/A1T1N1
odsloužit/A1T1N1
odsuzovat/A1T1N1
odvážet/A1J1T1N1
ohradit/A1C1N1
okrást/A1T1N1
onemocnět/A1N1
opomenout/A1T1N1
opříst/A1T1N1
oslavovat/A1T1N1
osvobodit/A1C1N1
otravovat/A1T1N1
ozdravit/A1T1N1
oželet/A1T1N1
patřit/A1N1
plašit/A1T1N1
pobuřovat/A1T1N1
podepisovat/A1T1N1
podplácet/A1J1T1N1
poděkovat/A1T1N1
pohovořit/A1T1N1
pokořit/A1T1N1
polemizovat/A1T1N1
pomodlit/A1T1N1
poplašit/A1T1N1
portrétovat/A1T1N1
posoudit/A1C1N1
posunovat/A1T1N1
potřísnit/A1T1N1
povznést/A1T1N1
poztrácet/A1J1T1N1
prahnout/A1N1
proběhnout/A1T1N1
prohloubit/A1T1N1
prokázat/A1T1N1
proniknout/A1T1N1
prorážet/A1J1T1N1
prosáknout/A1T1N1
pročistit/A1C1N1
pustošit/A1T1N1
předepisovat/A1T1N1
předčit/A1T1N1
překročit/A1T1N1
přemístit/A1T1N1
přerozdělovat/A1T1N1
přestřihnout/A1C1N1
přetížit/A1T1N1
přeřadit/A1C1T1N1
přihlašovat/A1T1N1
přilétnout/A1N1
připojit/A1T1N1
přistupovat/A1N1
přivyknout/A1T1N1
přišroubovat/A1T1N1
reagovat/A1T1N1
rekreovat/A1N1
rezervovat/A1T1N1
rozbušit/A1T1N1
rozhodnout/A1T1N1
rozkvést/A1T1N1
rozmlátit/A1C1N1
rozprostřít/A1T1N1
roztrhnout/A1C1N1
rozzlobit/A1T1N1
rušit/A1T1N1
schvalovat/A1T1N1
sesadit/A1C1N1
seřadit/A1C1T1N1
sjednocovat/A1T1N1
skrčit/A1T1N1
slunit/A1T1N1
smést/A1T1N1
soudit/A1C1N1
spiknout/A1T1N1
spoluvytvářet/A1J1T1N1
srážet/A1J1T1N1
stmelit/A1T1N1
strčit/A1T1N1
střetnout/A1T1N1
svléknout/A1T1N1
syčet/A1T1N1
tečovat/A1T1N1
transportovat/A1T1N1
trůnit/A1N1
tížit/A1T1N1
uchlácholit/A1T1N1
udělit/A1T1N1
uklidnit/A1T1N1
ulehčit/A1T1N1
umoudřit/A1N1
uplatnit/A1T1N1
upřít/A1T1N1
uskutečnit/A1T1N1
ustanovovat/A1T1N1
utišit/A1T1N1
utěšovat/A1T1N1
uvěznit/A1T1N1
ušlapat/A1J1T1N1
venčit/A1T1N1
vletět/A1T1N1
volit/A1T1N1
vstoupit/A1T1X1N1
vybavit/A1T1N1
vychodit/A1C1N1
vyfasovat/A1T1N1
vyhovovat/A1N1
vyjasňovat/A1T1N1
vykoupat/A1J1T1N1
vykázat/A1T1N1
vyloučit/A1T1N1
vymoci/A1C1N1
vynaleznout/A1N1
vyplavit/A1T1N1
vyprojektovat/A1T1N1
vyrobit/A1T1N1
vyslovovat/A1T1N1
vystrojit/A1T1N1
vytahovat/A1T1N1
vytvořit/A1T1N1
vyvlastnit/A1T1N1
vyzbrojovat/A1T1N1
vyčíst/A1T1N1
vyšlápnout/A1T1N1
vzkřiknout/A1T1N1
vázat/A1T1N1
vřadit/A1C1T1N1
zabolet/A1N1
zachraňovat/A1T1N1
zahanbit/A1T1N1
zahýbat/A1J1N1
zakopnout/A1T1N1
zalepit/A1T1N1
zamlčovat/A1T1N1
zaneprázdnit/A1T1N1
zaplnit/A1T1N1
zapřáhnout/A1C1N1
zasednout/A1T1N1
zastrašovat/A1T1N1
zatajovat/A1T1N1
zatroubit/A1T1N1
zavonět/A1N1
zaúpět/A1J1N1
zažertovat/A1N1
zdařit/A1T1N1
zdvihnout/A1C1N1
zesílit/A1T1N1
zhoupnout/A1N1
zkalit/A1T1N1
zkopírovat/A1T1N1
zlepšit/A1T1N1
zmobilizovat/A1T1N1
znechutit/A1C1N1
znevažovat/A1T1N1
zobecnit/A1T1N1
zpestřit/A1T1N1
zpronevěřit/A1T1N1
způsobovat/A1T1N1
zrušovat/A1T1N1
ztížit/A1T1N1
zviditelňovat/A1T1N1
zvýšit/A1T1N1
zúročit/A1T1N1
účtovat/A1T1N1
ředit/A1T1N1
škodit/A1N1
štípat/A1J1T1N1
žertovat/A1N1
